North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-09.5 Community Water Facility Loans [Repealed]

6-09.5-01.
Community Water Facility Loan Act — Intent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 1; 1997, ch. 94, § 3; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-02.
Community water facility — Definition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 2; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-03.
Transfer of funds — Revolving fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 3; 2013, ch. 20, § 16; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-04.
Loan applications — Approval. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 4; 1997, ch. 94, § 4; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-05.
Fund supervision and administration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 5; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-05.1.
Audit and costs of administration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 110, § 9; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-06.
Fund purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 6; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-07.
Loan terms. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 7; 1983, ch. 124, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-08.
Loan eligibility. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 8; 1997, ch. 94, § 5; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-09.
Project service area alternatives. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 9; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-10.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 10; 1997, ch. 94, § 6; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09.5-11.
Powers of Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 11; repealed by 2021, ch. 80, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.